dictsource/bof_rules
// Bété (Daloa) pronunciation rules
// Letter-to-phoneme rules based on verified corpus data
// Orthographic conventions → eSpeak phonemes

.L01 a e i o u

.group a
        a        a

.group b
        b        b
        bh       b_

.group c
        cu       tSu
        c        k

.group d
        d        d
        dl       dl
        dZ       dZ

.group e
        e        e

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        gb       gb
        gh       Q
        gl       gl
        gw       gw

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        i

.group j
        j        dZ

.group k
        k        k
        kp       kp
        kw       kw

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        ng       Ng
        ny       n^

.group o
        o        o

.group p
        p        p
        pl       pl

.group r
        r        r

.group s
        s        s
        sl       sl

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w
        wl       wl

.group y
        y        j
        yl       jl

.group z
        z        z

.group '
        '        ?

.group -
        -        _-

.group ɛ
        ɛ        E

.group ɔ
        ɔ        O

.group ɩ
        ɩ        i

.group ʋ
        ʋ        u

.group ö
        ö        o

.group ë
        ë        e

.group ï
        ï        i

.group ä
        ä        a
